Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1828.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52IMMUNIZATION COVERAGESec.5201. Scope of chapter.5202. Definitions.5203. Immunization coverage requirement. 5204. Additions and exceptions. 5205. Construction. 123456789101112131415 5206. Regulations. 5207. Enforcement. § 5201. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to immunization coverage.§ 5202. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices." The Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention."Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Cost-sharing." The share of health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that an enrollee pays out-of-pocket. The term includes deductibles, coinsurance, copayments and similar charges. The term does not include a premium, a balance billed amount from an out-of-network provider or the cost of a noncovered service."Enrollee." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 9103 (relating to definitions)."Grandfathered health care plan." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 9103."Health care provider." A person who is licensed, certified or otherwise regulated to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth."Health insurance policy." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 9103."Immunization." A vaccine or other immunizing agent. The term includes vaccines or other immunizing agents required to be 20250HB1828PN2415 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 covered by an individual health insurance policy approved to be offered or issued in this Commonwealth on January 1, 2025."Insurer." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 9103."Out-of-network provider." A health care provider who does not contract with an insurer to provide health care services to an enrollee under a health insurance policy.§ 5203. Immunization coverage requirement.An insurer offering, issuing or renewing a health insurance policy , other than a grandfathered health care plan, shall provide coverage and may not impose any cost-sharing requirements for an immunization to an enrollee. THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO A GRANDFATHERED HEALTH CARE PLAN.§ 5204. Additions and exceptions.(a) Authority of department.--The department may , IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, add or except an immunization from the coverage requirement if the Department of Health makes a determination consistent with the requirements of this section.(b) Additions to coverage requirement.--The department may add an immunization to the coverage requirement and establish the manner and frequency of the administration in consultation with the Department of Health, following BASED ON a determination by the Department of Health in accordance with the following:(1) One of the following:(i) the immunization is recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices; or(ii) both of the following are met:20250HB1828PN2415 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Immunization of certain populations is supported by medical evidence.(B) Immunization of certain populations would advance the public health by reducing the spread or severity of infectious diseases in this Commonwealth.(2) In making a determination under paragraph (1)(ii), the Department of Health may consider a report from any of the following entities as evidence to support a determination:(i) The American Academy of Pediatrics.(ii) The American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.(iii) The American College of Physicians.(iv) The American Academy of Family Physicians.(v) The Infectious Diseases Society of America.(vi) The Society for Maternal-Fetal Medicine.(c) Exceptions from coverage requirement.--(1) The department may except an immunization from the coverage requirement following a determination by the Department of Health that the immunization is NO LONGER : (i) No longer supported by medical evidence for certain populations . ; AND (ii) No longer effective to reduce the spread or severity of infectious diseases in this Commonwealth and thereby advance the public health.(2) The Department of Health may consider a report from any of the entities identified under subsection (b)(2) (B) as evidence to support a determination under paragraph (1).(d) Notice requirement.--After A determination of the Department of Health, the department shall provide notice of the 20250HB1828PN2415 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determination and addition or exception of an immunization from the coverage requirement by:(1) Transmitting a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) Posting the notice on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Electronically sending the notice to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Insurance Committee of the House of Representatives.(e) Effective date of addition or exception.--(1) An addition under subsection (b) shall apply as follows:(i) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the department, an addition shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this subparagraph.(ii) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the department, an addition shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this subparagraph.(2) An exception under subsection (c) shall apply as of the date of publication of the notice specified in subsection (d).§ 5205. Construction.(a) In general.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed 20250HB1828PN2415 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to diminish any other law that limits cost-sharing for a health care service or to prohibit an insurer from:(1) Providing coverage for immunizations in addition to the immunizations subject to coverage under this chapter.(2) Denying coverage for immunizations not subject to coverage under this chapter.(3) Using reasonable medical management techniques to determine the frequency, method, treatment or setting for an immunization, based on relevant clinical evidence, to the extent not specified in:(i) the relevant Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices recommendation supporting the immunization as of January 1, 2025; or(ii) the Department of Health determination adding a new immunization to coverage requirements.(b) Network considerations.--For an insurer that uses a network of health care providers to provide immunizations under a health insurance policy:(1) Subject to paragraph (2), nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:(i) Require the insurer to provide coverage for an immunization that is delivered by an out-of-network provider.(ii) Preclude the insurer from imposing cost-sharing requirements for an immunization that is delivered by an out-of-network provider.(2) If an insurer does not have an in-network health care provider who can provide an immunization to an enrollee, the insurer shall cover the immunization when performed by an out-of-network provider and may not impose cost-sharing.20250HB1828PN2415 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Protections.--Nothing in this chapter shall require a health insurance policy to cover an immunization if the enrollee is exempt by the exercise of the enrollee's constitutional protections of religious freedom under the act of December 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, No.214), known as the Religious Freedom Protection Act, or 42 U.S.C. Ch. 21B (relating to religious freedom restoration).§ 5206. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.§ 5207. Enforcement.(a) Penalties.--After satisfactory evidence of the violation of this chapter by an insurer, one or more of the following penalties may be imposed at the commissioner's discretion:(1) Suspension or revocation of the offending insurer's license.(2) Refusal, for a period not to exceed one year, to issue a new license to the offending insurer.(3) A fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation of this chapter.(4) A fine of not more than $10,000 for each willful violation of this chapter.(b) Limitation.--Fines imposed against an insurer under this section may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Additional remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including:(1) The act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as 20250HB1828PN2415 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. A violation of this chapter shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(2) The act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act.(3) The act of June 25, 1997 (P.L.295, No.29), known as the Pennsylvania Health Care Insurance Portability Act.(d) Administrative procedure.--The administrative provisions of this chapter shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies). A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 2. All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1828PN2415 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718